Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7957.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 64.35
DIGITAL ASSET KEYS -- PROHIBITION OF PRODUCTION OF PRIVATE KEYS
42-64.35-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Digital Asset Keys -- Prohibition of
Production of Private Keys."
42-64.35-2. Purpose.
This chapter prohibits the compelled production of a private key that relates to a digital
asset, except as provided in § 42-64.35-4.
42-64.35-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Private key" means a unique element of cryptographic data, or any substantially similar
analogue, which is:
(i) Held by a person;
(ii) Paired with a unique, publicly available element of cryptographic data; and
(iii) Associated with an algorithm that is necessary to carry out an encryption or decryption

required to execute a transaction.
42-64.35-4. Public key exception.
No person shall be compelled to produce a private key or make a private key known to any
other person in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative or other proceeding in this state that
relates to a digital asset, digital identity or other interest or right to which the private key provides
access, unless a public key is unavailable or unable to disclose the requisite information with
respect to the digital asset, digital identity or other interest or right.
42-64.35-5. No prohibition for lawful proceeding.
This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit any lawful proceeding that compels a
person to produce, sell, transfer, convey or disclose a digital asset, digital identity or other interest
or right to which a private key provides access, or to disclose information about the digital asset,
digital identity or other interest or right; provided that, the person is not required to produce or
disclose the private key except as otherwise required in this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005610
========
LC005610 - Page 2 of 3